District of Columbia statutes.
50-507

Other rights or remedies; limitations on actions.

(a)

Nothing in this chapter shall in any way limit the rights or remedies which are otherwise available to a consumer under any other law.

(b)

Any action brought pursuant to this chapter shall be commenced within 4 years of the date of original delivery of the motor vehicle to the consumer.

History

Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-162, § 9(b), (c), 32 DCR 160

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-1307.